Louisiana, session 2026, HB1189.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 56:302.9(A)(1)(b) and (3) are hereby amended and reenacted to read
as follows:
§302.9. Charter boat fishing guide license; nonresident fee
A.(1)
* * *
(b)(i) No person shall act as or represent himself to be a freshwater charter
boat fishing guide unless that person possesses a valid state charter boat fishing
guide license, proof of commercial marine insurance, and a valid state recreational
fishing license that grants fishing privileges appropriate for his charter activity. In
addition, any person acting as a freshwater charter boat fishing guide who is in
charge of the operation of a vessel shall have his required licenses and proof of
commercial marine insurance on his person while on the water. It shall not be a
violation of this Section for a person to represent himself as a charter boat fishing
guide if that person held a valid license during the previous thirty days but has not
renewed the license. The department shall provide written notification to the holder
of a license issued pursuant to this Subparagraph that the holder may be subject to
other requirements of law, including holding a valid captain's license issued by the
United States Coast Guard.
Page 1 of 2
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 1189 ENROLLED
(ii) A freshwater charter boat fishing guide, if operating on waters of the
United States located in Louisiana, shall possess a valid captain's license issued by
the United States Coast Guard.
* * *
(3) The nonresident charter boat fishing guide license shall be available only
from the Baton Rouge office of the Department of Wildlife and Fisheries. Such
licenses shall be issued on a consignment basis, and no agent fees shall apply. A
nonresident saltwater charter boat fishing guide license shall be made available only
to those persons who possess a valid captain's license issued by the United States
Coast Guard.
* * *
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 2 of 2
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.